California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(k) When reviewing gynecologic slides using automated or semiautomated screening devices approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration, a laboratory shall follow the workload requirements established by Section 493.1274 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(1) Any slide reviewed using automated or semiautomated screening devices approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration that requires full manual review shall be counted against the applicable limits established in subdivision (a) and this subdivision.

(2) On or before June 30, 2007, the State Department of Health Services shall review published evidence-based peer review journal articles that review the performance of both automated and semiautomated screening devices, subsequent to the approval of the device by the federal Food and Drug Administration, and shall determine whether increasing the number of slides reviewed on a daily basis increases the rate of error. If the department determines that the volume of screening on these devices increases the rate of error, the department may issue new regulations in that regard that are consistent with Section 493.1274 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(l) The technical supervisor of an individual who performs primary screening shall establish the maximum workload limit for the individual, based on the individual’s performance, in accordance with the criteria set forth in Section 493.1274(d)(1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(m) Where cytotechnologists are represented by a labor organization, the maximum workload limitations otherwise established pursuant to this section shall be contained in a collective bargaining agreement or memorandum of understanding negotiated between the employer and the labor organization.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 735, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2007, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1271.1.

(a) Clinical laboratories which are licensed pursuant to this chapter and provide cytology services shall, if the licensee ceases operation, preserve records, reports, cytology slides, and cell blocks as prescribed in subdivision (g) of Section 1271 and Section 1274. 

(b) Any person injured as a result of the licensee’s abandonment of records may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction for the amount of any damages suffered as a result. In the event the licensee was a corporation or partnership which has been dissolved, the person injured may bring an action against that corporation’s or partnership’s principal officers of record at the time of the dissolution. 

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply: 

(1) “Abandonment of records” means violating subdivision (a) and thereby leaving patients and physicians and surgeons without access to information to which they are entitled pursuant to this chapter. 

(2) “Principal officers” means: 

(A) In the case of a partnership other than a limited partnership, any partner. 

(B) In the case of a limited partnership, any general partner, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 15611 of the Corporations Code. 

(C) In the case of a corporation, the chairperson of the board, the chief executive officer, and the president of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

1272.

A clinical laboratory shall participate in a state-approved proficiency testing program and demonstrate satisfactory performance in all of the laboratory specialities that include tests performed in the laboratory. Proficiency shall be tested in the following specialties: microbiology, serology, clinical chemistry, hematology, cytology, and immunohematology.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 927, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1272.4.

The department shall establish standards for the evaluation of cytologic slides, for reporting the adequacy of cytologic slides, for a cytotechnologist competency program, and for a proficiency testing program for clinical laboratories providing cytology services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 927, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1272.6.

The department shall, on or before January 1, 1992, develop or adopt a proficiency testing program for laboratories providing cytology services which may be administered by the department or by a proficiency testing service or program approved by the department. The proficiency program established pursuant to this section shall include announced and unannounced onsite proficiency testing, with that testing to take place, to the extent practicable, under normal working conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1019, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1274.

(a) A laboratory shall document to persons submitting cytologic samples for evaluation, on a quarterly basis, informational letters on all cases of HSIL (high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions), adenocarcinoma, or other malignant neoplasm. Documentation may consist of followup correspondence, telephone calls, or requests included in the report. Copies of that documentation, and any responses received to those letters, shall be maintained on file by the laboratories for a period of five years.

(b) Whenever it becomes known to a clinical laboratory that an abnormality of HSIL (high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions, adenocarcinoma, or other malignant neoplasm) has been identified for a patient for whom the clinical laboratory earlier reported a normal finding, all previous available cytologic slides on that patient shall be reexamined by the clinical laboratory.

(c) Records of the review of previous slides required by subdivision (b) shall be maintained by the clinical laboratory, including the name of the individual performing the earlier examination.

(d) A clinical laboratory shall maintain records of all false positive and false negative cases.

When any errors in the reporting of a smear evaluation are discovered, a corrected report shall be immediately sent, when medically applicable. Copies of corrected reports shall be maintained in the laboratory records for a period of 10 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1275.

The department shall develop and implement regulations for continuing education for persons licensed pursuant to this chapter on or before January 1, 1992, after consulting with the multidisciplinary committee established pursuant to Section 1228, and other appropriate organizations. On and after January 1, 1994, the department shall require not more than 12 hours of continuing education completed within a 12-month period or not more than 24 hours of continuing education completed within a 24-month period as a condition for renewal of a license issued under this chapter. The department may establish a fee for the implementation of this section, the total fees collected not to exceed the total costs to the program for the implementation of this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 319, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Offenses Against the Chapter [1280. - 1291.]

1280.

It is unlawful for any person to represent himself or act as a licensed individual under this chapter unless he is, in fact, duly licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1281.

It is unlawful for any person to own, operate, maintain, direct, or engage in the business of operating a clinical laboratory, as defined in this chapter, unless he or she possesses a valid clinical laboratory license issued by the department. In the event a health facility does not perform clinical laboratory services, but provides laboratory services to its patients under an agreement with another person or entity that holds and is operating under a valid clinical laboratory license, the health facility shall not be required to obtain a clinical laboratory license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 261, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1281.1.

It is unlawful for any person, including a person who owns, operates, or directs a clinical laboratory, to provide, offer, or solicit, any form of payment or gratuity for human blood or any other biological specimen provided for the purpose of clinical laboratory testing or clinical laboratory practice, unless the person is serving as an agent of a clinical laboratory or another facility legally utilizing those specimens only for purposes of research or teaching or for quality assurance purposes, or is an entity licensed under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1282.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in clinical laboratory practice in a clinical laboratory unless he or she is a duly licensed physician and surgeon or is duly authorized to do so under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 195, Sec. 9.   Effective July 9, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1282.2.

It is unlawful for any person to perform venipuncture, skin puncture, or arterial puncture to collect a biological specimen unless he or she is authorized to do so under this chapter, the regulations adopted thereunder, or under other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1282.3.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to act with willful or wanton disregard for a person’s safety that exposes the person to a substantial risk of, or that causes, great bodily injury by affecting the integrity of a clinical laboratory test or examination result through improper collection, handling, storage, or labeling of the biological specimen or the erroneous transcription or reporting of clinical laboratory test or examination results.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1287, a violation of this section shall be punished as follows:

(1) A first conviction is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period of not
 more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months, or two or three years, by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both this imprisonment and fine.

(2) A second or subsequent conviction is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, four, or six years, or by a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both this imprisonment and fine.

(c) The enforcement remedies provided under this section are not exclusive, and shall not preclude the use of any other criminal or civil remedy. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by this section and any other provision of law shall not be punished under more than one provision. Under those circumstances, the penalty to be imposed shall be determined as set forth in
 Section 654 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1283.

It is unlawful for any person to conduct, maintain, or operate a clinical laboratory unless he is a duly licensed physician and surgeon or is duly authorized to do so under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1284 by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1284.

It is unlawful for a duly licensed physician and surgeon, or any person authorized to serve as director under this chapter, to serve only as a nominal director.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1285 by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1285.

It is unlawful for any person conducting, maintaining, or operating a clinical laboratory to employ any person to perform clinical laboratory procedures unless the person is a duly licensed physician and surgeon or is duly authorized to do so under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1286 by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1286.

It is unlawful for any person to operate a school or conduct any course for the purpose of training or preparing persons to perform duties, as defined under this chapter and regulations of the department, without having first secured the approval of the department as herein provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

1287.

(a) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable upon conviction by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding six months or by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a violation of Section 1281.1 is a public offense and is punishable upon conviction by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a violation of Section 1282.2 is a public offense and is punishable upon conviction by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(3) The enforcement remedies provided under this section are not exclusive, and shall not preclude the use of any other criminal or civil remedy. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by this section and any other provision of law shall not be punished under more than one provision. Under those circumstances, the penalty to be imposed shall be determined as set forth in Section 654 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1288.

Any person conducting or operating a clinical laboratory may accept assignments for tests only from and make reports only to persons licensed under the provisions of law relating to the healing arts or their representatives. This section does not prohibit the acceptance of evaluation specimens for proficiency testing or referral of specimens or such assignment from one clinical laboratory to another clinical laboratory, either licensed or exempt under this chapter, providing the report indicates clearly the laboratory performing the test. A report of results issuing from a clinical laboratory shall show clearly the name and address of the laboratory and the name of the director.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1292 by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1288.3.

(a) If a clinical laboratory employee, agent, or courier retrieves biological specimens located in a public place outside of the custodial control of a licensee, or his or her employee, agent, or contractor, and those specimens are not secured in a locked container, the clinical laboratory employee, agent, or courier, utilizing the form provided by the State Department of Health Services pursuant to Section 1220.5, shall (1) notify the licensee by attaching the appropriate copy of the form to the unlocked storage container, and (2) mail the appropriate copy of the form to the Department of Consumer Affairs. The Department of Consumer Affairs shall forward all forms received to the appropriate licensing entity.

(b) This section shall not apply where the biological specimens have been received by mail in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations.

(c) For purposes of this section: (1) “locked container” means a secure container that is fully enclosed and locked by a padlock, key lock, combination lock, or similar locking device.

(2) “Licensee” means a person licensed pursuant to this division 2 (commencing with Section 500), who collects human biological specimens for clinical testing or examination.

(d) A violation of this section is not subject to Section 1287.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2001. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require clinical laboratory employees, agents, or couriers to notify licensees or the Department of Consumer Affairs of an unsecured specimen if the State Department of Health Services has not provided the appropriate forms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 748, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Section operative January 1, 2001, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1288.5.

No person may solicit or accept any biological specimen for clinical laboratory testing or examination unless there is in effect for the clinical laboratory where the test or examination is to be performed a license or registration issued pursuant to this chapter applicable to the category of test or examination which includes that testing or examination, and the person performing the test or examination is authorized to perform the test or examination under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1289.

The violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of or conspiring to violate any provision or term of this chapter or regulations promulgated thereunder constitutes unprofessional conduct within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1290.

With the exception of narcotics and dangerous drugs stored on the licensed clinical laboratory premises for use exclusively as standards for the purpose of testing, the violation of any of the statutes of this state regulating narcotics and dangerous drugs constitutes unprofessional conduct within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

1291.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a licensed physician and surgeon from instructing or training any person employed by him to work in a laboratory maintained by such physician and surgeon as an incident of his own medical practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [1300. - 1302.]

1300.

The amount of application, registration, certification, and license fees under this chapter shall be as follows:

(a) The application fee for a histocompatibility laboratory director’s, clinical laboratory bioanalyst’s, clinical chemist’s, clinical microbiologist’s, clinical laboratory toxicologist’s, clinical genetic molecular biologist’s, clinical cytogeneticist’s, clinical laboratory geneticist’s, or clinical reproductive biologist’s license, or license for another specialty or subspecialty specified by regulation adopted by the department, is
 five hundred seventy dollars ($570).

(b) The annual renewal fee for a license listed in subdivision (a) is five hundred seventy dollars ($570).

(c) The application fee for a clinical laboratory scientist’s or limited clinical laboratory scientist’s license is three hundred dollars ($300).

(d) The application and annual renewal fee for a
 cytotechnologist’s license is
 two hundred sixty dollars ($260).

(e) The annual renewal fee for a clinical laboratory scientist’s or limited clinical laboratory scientist’s license is three hundred dollars ($300).

(f) The application and annual renewal fee for a phlebotomist’s certification is one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(g) A clinical laboratory applying for a license to perform tests or examinations classified as of moderate or of high complexity under CLIA and a clinical laboratory applying for certification under subdivision (c) of Section 1223 shall pay an application fee for that license or certification based on the number of tests it performs or expects to perform in a year, as follows:

(1) Less than 2,001 tests:
 three hundred thirty-five dollars ($335).

(2) Between 2,001 and 10,000, inclusive, tests:
 one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100).

(3) Between 10,001 and 25,000, inclusive, tests:
 one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800).

(4) Between 25,001 and 50,000, inclusive, tests:
 two thousand two hundred dollars ($2,200).

(5) Between 50,001 and 75,000, inclusive, tests:
 two thousand seven hundred dollars ($2,700).

(6) Between 75,001 and 100,000, inclusive, tests: three thousand three hundred dollars ($3,300).

(7) Between 100,001 and 500,000, inclusive, tests:
 four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(8) Between 500,001 and 1,000,000, inclusive, tests:
 seven thousand two hundred dollars ($7,200).

(9) More than 1,000,000 tests: eight thousand six hundred thirty dollars ($8,630) plus four hundred twenty dollars ($420) for every 500,000 tests over 1,000,000, up to a maximum of 15,000,000 tests.

(h) A clinical laboratory performing tests or examinations classified as of moderate or of high complexity under CLIA and a clinical laboratory with a certificate issued under subdivision (c) of Section 1223 shall pay an annual renewal fee based on the number of tests it performed in the preceding calendar year, as
 follows:

(1) Less than 2,001 tests: three hundred thirty-five dollars ($335).

(2) Between 2,001 and 10,000, inclusive, tests:
 one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100).

(3) Between 10,001 and 25,000, inclusive, tests:
 one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800).

(4) Between 25,001 and 50,000, inclusive, tests: two thousand two hundred dollars ($2,200).

(5) Between 50,001 and 75,000, inclusive, tests: two thousand seven hundred dollars ($2,700).

(6) Between 75,001 and 100,000, inclusive, tests:
 three hundred three hundred dollars ($3,300).

(7) Between 100,001 and 500,000, inclusive, tests:
 four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(8) Between 500,001 and 1,000,000, inclusive, tests:
 seven thousand two hundred dollars ($7,200).

(9) More than 1,000,000 tests per year: eight thousand six hundred thirty dollars ($8,630) plus four hundred twenty dollars ($420) for every 500,000 tests over 1,000,000, up to a maximum of 15,000,000 tests.

(i) The application fee for a
 trainee’s license is forty-five dollars ($45).

(j) The annual renewal fee for a trainee’s license is forty-five dollars ($45).

(k) The application fee for a duplicate license is five dollars ($5).

(l) The personnel licensing delinquency fee is equal to the annual renewal fee.

(m) The
 director may establish a fee for examinations required under this chapter. The fee shall not exceed the total cost to the department in conducting the examination.

(n) A clinical laboratory subject to registration under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1265 and performing only those clinical laboratory tests or examinations considered waived under CLIA shall pay an annual fee of one hundred
 fifty-five dollars ($155). A clinical laboratory subject to registration under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1265 and performing only provider-performed microscopy, as defined under CLIA, shall pay an annual fee of two hundred thirty-five dollars ($235). A clinical laboratory performing both waived and provider-performed microscopy shall pay an annual registration fee of two hundred thirty-five dollars ($235).

(o) The costs of the department in conducting a complaint investigation, imposing sanctions, or conducting a hearing under this chapter shall be paid by the clinical laboratory. The fee shall be no greater than the fee the laboratory would pay under CLIA for the same type of activities and shall not be payable if the clinical laboratory would not be required to pay those fees under CLIA.

(p) The state, a district, city, county, city and county, or other political subdivision, or any public officer or
 body shall be subject to the payment of fees established pursuant to this chapter or regulations adopted thereunder.

(q) In addition to the payment of registration or licensure fees, a clinical laboratory located outside the State of California shall reimburse the department for travel and per diem to perform any necessary onsite inspections at the clinical laboratory in order to ensure compliance with this chapter.

(r) The department shall establish an application fee and a renewal fee for a medical laboratory technician license, the total fees collected not to exceed the costs of the department for the implementation and operation of the program licensing and regulating medical laboratory technicians pursuant to Section 1260.3.

(s) The costs of the department to conduct any reinspections to ensure compliance of a laboratory applying for initial licensure shall be paid by the laboratory. This additional cost for each visit shall be equal to the initial application fee and shall be paid by the laboratory prior to issuance of a license. The department shall not charge a
 reinspection fee if the reinspection is due to error or omission on the part of the department.

(t) A fee of
 twenty-eight dollars ($28) shall be assessed for approval of each additional location authorized by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1265.

(u) On or before July 1, 2013, the department shall report to the Legislature during the annual legislative budget hearing process the extent to which the state oversight program meets or exceeds federal oversight standards and the extent to which the federal Department of Health and Human Services is accepting exemption applications and the potential cost to the state for an exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 3.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1300.1.

(a) The application, registration, certification, and license fees specified in Section 1300 shall be adjusted annually in the manner specified in Section 100450 of the Health and Safety Code. The adjustments shall be rounded off to the nearest whole dollar amount.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 4.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1300.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the total fees collected under this chapter shall not exceed the costs incurred by the department for licensing, certification, inspection, or other activities relating to the regulation of clinical laboratories and their personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 201, Sec. 5.   (SB 744)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

(a) The annual renewal fee for a clinical laboratory license or registration set under this chapter shall be paid during the 30-day period before the expiration date of the license or registration. If the license or registration is not renewed before the expiration date, the licensee or registrant, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall pay a delinquency fee equal to 25 percent of the annual renewal fee for up to 60 days after the expiration date, in addition to the annual renewal fee in effect on the last preceding regular renewal date. Failure to pay the annual renewal fee in advance during the time the license or registration remains in force shall, ipso facto, work a forfeiture of the license or registration after a period of 60 days from the expiration date of the license or
 registration.

(b) (1) The department shall give written notice to all persons licensed pursuant to Section 1260, 1260.1, 1261, 1261.5, 1262, 1264, or 1270 30 days in advance of the regular renewal date that a renewal fee has not been paid. In addition, the department shall give written notice to licensed clinical laboratory bioanalysts or doctoral degree specialists and clinical laboratory scientists or limited clinical laboratory scientists by registered or certified mail 90 days in advance of the expiration of the fifth year that a renewal fee has not been paid and if not paid before the expiration of the fifth year of delinquency the licensee may be subject to reexamination.

(2) If the renewal fee is not paid for five or more years, the department may require an examination before reinstating the license, except that no examination shall be required as a
 condition for reinstatement if the original license was issued without an examination. No examination shall be required for reinstatement if the license was forfeited solely by reason of nonpayment of the renewal fee if the nonpayment was for less than five years.

(3) If the license is not renewed within 60 days after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall pay the delinquency fee identified in subdivision (k) of Section 1300, in addition to the renewal fee in effect on the last preceding regular renewal date. Payment of the delinquency fee will not be necessary if within 60 days of the license expiration date the licensee files with the department an application for inactive status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 7.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department may establish such license periods and renewal dates for all licenses issued under this chapter in a manner as to best distribute the license renewal process throughout a given year, or longer period, if necessary, to permit the most efficient and economical use of the department’s personnel and equipment. To the extent practical, provision shall be made for the proration or other fee adjustments in a manner that no licensee shall be required to pay a greater or lesser fee than he or she would have been required to pay if the change in license periods or renewal dates had not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 195, Sec. 10.   Effective July 9, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury, the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Fund.

(b) All fees established under this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall be collected by and paid to the department, and shall be deposited by the department in the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Fund, along with any other moneys received by the department for the purpose of licensing, certification, inspection, proficiency testing, or other regulation of clinical laboratories, blood banks, or clinical laboratory personnel. Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, all interest earned on moneys deposited in the fund shall be maintained in the fund.

(c) Moneys deposited in the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Fund that are appropriated in the annual Budget Act, or any other appropriation, for support of, or expenditure by, the state department shall, upon appropriation, be expended by the state department to administer this chapter and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. All fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall, upon appropriation, be expended to administer this chapter and shall not be redirected for any other purpose. All fees collected pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall, upon appropriation, be expended to administer that chapter and shall not be redirected for any other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 201, Sec. 7.   (SB 744)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Penalties [1310. - 1311.]

1310.

If the department determines that a laboratory that has been issued a license or registration under this chapter, except for a laboratory only performing tests or examinations classified as waived under CLIA, no longer substantially meets the requirements of this chapter or the regulations adopted thereunder, the department, in lieu of, or in addition to, revocation or suspension of the license or registration under Section 1320 or 1323, may impose any of the following:

(a) Directed plans of correction, as defined under CLIA.

(b) Civil money penalties in an amount ranging from fifty dollars ($50) to three thousand dollars ($3,000) per day of noncompliance, or per violation, for a condition-level deficiency that does not pose immediate jeopardy, to an amount ranging from three thousand fifty dollars ($3,050) to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day of noncompliance, or per violation, for a condition-level deficiency that poses immediate jeopardy, but only after notice and an opportunity to respond in accordance with Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, and consideration of facts enumerated in CLIA in Section 493.1834 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) Civil money penalties in an amount ranging from fifty dollars ($50) to three thousand dollars ($3,000) per day of noncompliance, or per violation, for a violation of subdivision (t) of Section 1320, for failure to comply with disease reporting requirements, but only after notice and an opportunity to respond in accordance with Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Onsite monitoring, as defined under CLIA, and payment for the costs of onsite monitoring.

(e) Any combination of the actions described in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 219, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1311.

The department shall have three years from the date of a violation of this chapter or of a regulation adopted thereunder to file a civil or administrative action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Denial, Revocation and Suspension of Licenses [1320. - 1327.]

1320.

The department may deny, suspend, or revoke any license or registration issued under this chapter for any of the following reasons:

(a) Conduct involving moral turpitude or dishonest reporting of tests.

(b) Violation by the applicant, licensee, or registrant of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(c) Aiding, abetting, or permitting the violation of this chapter, the rules or regulations adopted under this chapter or the Medical Practice Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2.

(d) Permitting a licensed trainee to perform tests or procure specimens unless under the direct and responsible supervision of a person duly licensed under this chapter or physician and surgeon other than another licensed trainee.

(e) Violation of any provision of this code governing the practice of medicine and surgery.

(f) Proof that an applicant, licensee, or registrant has made false statements in any material regard on the application for a license, registration, or renewal issued under this chapter.

(g) Conduct inimical to the public health, morals, welfare, or safety of the people of the State of California in the maintenance or operation of the premises or services for which a license or registration is issued under this chapter.

(h) Proof that the applicant or licensee has used any degree, or certificate, as a means of qualifying for licensure that has been purchased or procured by barter or by any unlawful means or obtained from any institution that at the time the degree, certificate, or title was obtained was not recognized or accredited by the department of education of the state where the institution is or was located to give training in the field of study in which the degree, certificate, or title is claimed.

(i) Violation of any of the prenatal laws or regulations pertaining thereto in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 120675) of Part 3 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code and Article 1 (commencing with Section 1125) of Group 4 of Subchapter 1 of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(j) Knowingly accepting an assignment for clinical laboratory tests or specimens from and the rendering of a report thereon to persons not authorized by law to submit those specimens or assignments.

(k) Rendering a report on clinical laboratory work actually performed in another clinical laboratory without designating clearly the name and address of the laboratory in which the test was performed.

(l) Conviction of a felony or of any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude under the laws of any state or of the United States arising out of or in connection with the practice of clinical laboratory technology. The record of conviction or a certified copy thereof shall be conclusive evidence of that conviction.

(m) Unprofessional conduct.

(n) The use of drugs or alcoholic beverages to the extent or in a manner as to be dangerous to a person licensed under this chapter, or any other person to the extent that that use impairs the ability of the licensee to conduct with safety to the public the practice of clinical laboratory technology.

(o) Misrepresentation in obtaining a license or registration.

(p) Performance of, or representation of the laboratory as entitled to perform, a clinical laboratory test or examination or other procedure that is not within the specialties or subspecialties, or category of laboratory procedures authorized by the license or registration.

(q) Refusal of a reasonable request of HCFA, a HCFA agent, the department, or any employee, agent, or contractor of the department, for permission to inspect, pursuant to this chapter, the laboratory and its operations and pertinent records during the hours the laboratory is in operation.

(r) Failure to comply with reasonable requests of the department for any information, work, or materials that the department concludes is necessary to determine the laboratory’s continued eligibility for its license or registration, or its continued compliance with this chapter or the regulations adopted under this chapter.

(s) Failure to comply with a sanction imposed under Section 1310.

(t) Failure to comply with the disease reporting requirements adopted pursuant to Section 120130 of the Health and Safety Code. However, when a laboratory is not able to obtain complete information for a patient within the reporting timeframes, it shall document that it made a good faith effort to do so and it shall submit the report with the available information within the required reporting timeframes and, in that case, the laboratory shall not be subject to sanctions for failure to submit complete patient information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 219, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1321.

For purposes of this chapter, a conviction means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. An action to deny, revoke, or suspend the license or registration may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of a sentence, notwithstanding a subsequent order pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code permitting withdrawal of a plea of guilty, or setting aside a verdict of guilty or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment. The director shall take into account all competent evidence or rehabilitation furnished.
